Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 2

City Recorder

6-4-201. City recorder — Appointment.

The board shall appoint a city recorder, who also may be appointed to the positions of finance director or treasurer, or both.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

6-4-202. Recorder's functions at board meeting.

The recorder or the recorder's designee shall be present at all meetings of the board, and keep a full and accurate record of all business transacted by the board to be preserved in permanent form.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1.

6-4-203. Custody of official records.

The recorder or the recorder's designee shall have custody of, and preserve in the recorder's office, the city seal, the public records, original rolls of ordinance, ordinance books, minutes of the board, contracts, bonds, title deeds, certificates, and papers, all official indemnity or security bonds, except the recorder's bond, which shall be in the custody of the mayor, and all other bonds, oaths and affirmations and all other records, papers and documents not required by this charter or by ordinance to be deposited elsewhere, and register them by numbers, dates and contents, and keep an accurate and modern index of such material.

All such records shall be the property of the municipality.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1.

6-4-204. Copies of records and ordinances.

The recorder shall provide, copy, and, when required by any officer or person, certify copies of records, papers and documents in the recorder's office.

Fees for copying and certification shall be charged as established by ordinance.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1.